Louisiana, session 2026, SB314.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:2724(B)(2)(a) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as
follows:
§2724. Qualification; certified social worker
* * *
B. * * *
(2)(a) At the end of the three-year certification period, a certified social
worker who has provided CPST services pursuant to R.S. 40:2162 and who meets
all the qualifications for licensure as a licensed master's social worker except for the
provisions of R.S. 37:2707(A)(3) shall petition the board at least sixty days prior to
the expiration of the certificate for an extension of the certification for the limited
purpose of providing CPST services as defined in R.S. 40:2162. Any certified social
worker whose three-year certification period expired in calendar year 2025
shall be allowed to avail themselves of the rights provided for in this Paragraph.
Any certified social worker who had a certification expire in calendar year 2025
shall have it renewed immediately to allow the individual to proceed with the
CPST extension request provided for in this Paragraph.
* * *
Section 2. R.S. 40:31.3(C) and (D) are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 40:31.3(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 314 ENROLLED
§31.3. Adolescent school health initiative; health centers in schools
* * *
C. The office of public health shall develop a policy, at a minimum, that
provides for all of the following:
(1) Healthcare providers who are licensed, certified, or registered by
their applicable licensing, certification, or registration board, who provide
documentation of having passed a criminal background check conducted by the
Louisiana State Police, and who are in good standing with the applicable board
shall not be required by a public school governing authority to complete an
additional criminal background check in order to begin providing school-based
health center services.
(2) School-based health center services shall be permitted during school
hours if the student's parent or legal guardian has requested such services and
a healthcare provider determines that evaluation or treatment is necessary
during school hours to assist the student with a health condition, illness, or
injury requiring evaluation or treatment.
(3) A public school governing authority shall not prohibit a health
evaluation, assessment, or authorized treatment plan from being performed on
school property in order to establish medical necessity or deliver medically
necessary services.
(4) The determination of the need for health evaluation and school-based
health center services shall be made by a healthcare provider acting within the
scope of his professional license. No school employee who is not licensed to
provide healthcare services shall determine whether a student may receive an
evaluation or treatment by a healthcare provider.
D. Health centers in schools are prohibited from:
(1) Counseling or advocating abortion in any way or referring any student to
any organization for counseling or advocating abortion.
(2) Distributing at any public school any contraceptive or abortifacient drug,
device, or other similar product.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 314 ENROLLED
D.E. The provisions of this Section shall be applicable only to the extent that
funds are made available for this purpose from public or private sources.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor
or, if not signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law
without signature by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the
Constitution of Louisiana. If vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by
the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.